fr: Mode d’installation du tampon d’entraînement: Pad d’entraînement pour pédale de grosse caisse; À pince; Pad d’entraînement pour genoux / cuisses; Base à pieds / trépied incluse; Montage multiposition / ajustable; Compatible avec montage sur rack; Compatible avec support de caisse claire; Monté sur support (support pour pad d’entraînement); Sur table / base plate; Autre
th: รูปแบบการติดตั้งแผ่นรองฝึกซ้อม: แป้นซ้อมกระเดื่องกลองเบส; แบบหนีบ; แป้นซ้อมวางตัก / เข่า; มีขา / ฐานตั้งสามขา; ฐานติดตั้งปรับตำแหน่งได้หลายทิศทาง; ใช้งานกับแร็คติดอุปกรณ์ได้; ใช้งานกับขาตั้งกลองสแนร์ได้; ติดตั้งบนขาตั้ง (ขาตั้งแป้นซ้อม); วางบนโต๊ะ / ฐานแบนเรียบ; อื่นๆ
pl: Styl montażu pada treningowego: Pad do ćwiczeń stopy perkusyjnej; Montaż na klamrę; Pad na kolana/uda; W zestawie z nóżkami / podstawą trójnogu; Montaż wielopozycyjny / regulowany; Kompatybilny z ramą perkusyjną (rack); Kompatybilny ze statywem werblowym; Montowany na statywie (statyw na pad); Na blat / płaska podstawa; Inne
bg-BG: Начин на монтаж на тренировъчната подложка: Тренировъчен пад за педал на басов барабан; С щипка; Тренировъчен пад за скут/коляно; Включена основа с крака/трипод; Многопозиционен / регулируем монтаж; Съвместим с рак стойка; Съвместим със стойка за соло барабан; Монтаж на стойка (за тренировъчен пад); За маса / плоска основа; Друго
it: Stile di montaggio del pad da esercitazione: Pad di allenamento per pedale per cassa; A morsetto; Pad di allenamento da grembo/ginocchio; Base con gambe/treppiede inclusa; Supporto multiposizione/regolabile; Compatibile con montaggio a rack; Compatibile con supporto per rullante; Montato su supporto (supporto per pad di allenamento); Da tavolo/a base piatta; Altro
lt-LT: Praktinio pado tvirtinimo tipas: Bosinio būgno pedalo treniruočių padas; Tvirtinamas spaustuku; Ant kelių dedamas treniruočių padas; Pridedamas pagrindas su kojelėmis / trikojis; Daugiapozicis / reguliuojamas laikiklis; Suderinama su montavimu į stovą; Suderinamas su mažojo būgno stovu; Montuojamas ant stovo (treniruočių pado stovas); Stalo / plokščias pagrindas; Kita
ja: 練習パッドの取り付けスタイル: バスドラムペダル用練習パッド; クランプ式; 膝置き練習パッド; 脚/三脚ベース付属; マルチポジション/調整可能マウント; ラックマウント対応; スネアスタンド対応; スタンドマウント (練習パッドスタンド); 卓上/フラットベース; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem do pad de treino: Pad de prática para pedal de bombo; De fixação; Pad de prática para colo/joelho; Base com pernas/tripé incluída; Montagem em várias posições/ajustável; Compatível com montagem em rack; Compatível com suporte de tarola; Montado em suporte (suporte para pad de prática); Mesa/base plana; Outro
sk-SK: Spôsob montáže cvičnej podložky: Cvičná podložka na pedál basového bubna; So svorkou; Cvičná podložka na lono/koleno; Vrátane základne s nohami/statívom; Viacpolohová/nastaviteľná montáž; Kompatibilné s montážou do racku; Kompatibilné so stojanom na malý bubon; Montáž na stojan (stojan na cvičnú podložku); Stolová/plochá základňa; Iná
nb: Monteringsstil for øvingspad: Øvingspute for basstrommepedal; Klemmebasert; Øvingspute for fang / kne; Medfølgende stativ / tripod-base; Flerposisjons / justerbart feste; Kompatibel med rackfeste; Kompatibel med skarptrommestativ; Stativmontert (øvingsputestativ); Bordmodell / flat base; Annet
tr: Egzersiz pedi montaj stili: Bas davul pedalı çalışma pedi; Kelepçeli; Kucak / diz çalışma pedi; Ayaklı / tripod taban dahil; Çok konumlu / ayarlanabilir montaj; Rafa monte edilebilir; Trampet standıyla uyumlu; Standa monte (çalışma pedi standı); Masaüstü / düz taban; Diğer
el: Τρόπος στήριξης της σουρντίνας εξάσκησης.: Pad εξάσκησης με πετάλι γκραν κάσας; Με σφιγκτήρα; Pad εξάσκησης στα πόδια / γόνατα; Περιλαμβάνεται βάση με πόδια / τρίποδο; Βάση πολλαπλών θέσεων / ρυθμιζόμενη; Συμβατό με βάση rack; Συμβατό με βάση ταμπούρου; Τοποθέτηση σε βάση (βάση pad εξάσκησης); Επιτραπέζιο / επίπεδη βάση; Άλλο
de: Montageart des Übungspads: Übungspad für Bassdrum-Pedal; Zum Anklemmen; Übungspad für Schoß/Knie; Mit Beinen/Dreibeinstativ; Multiposition/verstellbare Halterung; Kompatibel mit Rackmontage; Kompatibel mit Snare-Ständer; Ständermontage (Übungspad-Ständer); Tischplatte/flache Basis; Sonstige
hu: Gyakorlópárna rögzítési típusa: Lábdob pedál gyakorlópad; Bilincses rögzítésű; Térdre/ölbe rögzíthető gyakorlópad; Lábakkal / háromlábú állvánnyal; Többpozíciós / állítható rögzítés; Karámra (rack) szerelhető; Pergőállvánnyal kompatibilis; Állványra szerelt (gyakorlópad állvány); Asztali / lapos talp; Egyéb
pt-BR: Pad de estudo estilo de montagem: Pad de treino para pedal de bumbo; Fixação com abraçadeira; Pad de treino para colo/joelho; Base com pernas/tripé incluída; Suporte multiposição / ajustável; Compatível com montagem em rack; Compatível com suporte para caixa; Montado em suporte (suporte de pad de treino); Mesa / base plana; Outros
ro-RO: Stil de montare a plăcuței de exersare: Pad de antrenament pentru pedala tobei mari; Cu clemă; Pad de antrenament pentru genunchi; Bază cu picioare / trepied inclus; Montură multipoziție / reglabilă; Compatibil cu montarea pe cadru; Compatibil cu stativul pentru tobă mică; Montat pe stativ (stativ pentru pad de antrenament); Masă / bază plată; Altele
hr-HR: Stil montaže jastučića za vježbanje: Jastučić za vježbanje s pedalom za bas bubanj; S pričvršćivačem; Jastučić za vježbanje u krilu / na koljenu; Uključene noge / baza stativa; Nosač s više položaja / prilagodljivi nosač; Kompatibilno s nosačem na stalku; Kompatibilno sa stalkom za mali bubanj; Montirano na stalak (stalak za jastučić za vježbanje); Za stol / ravna baza; Ostalo
sv: Monteringsstil för övningsplatta: Övningsplatta för bastrumpedal; Med klämma; Övningsplatta för knä/lår; Stativ med ben ingår; Multiposition / justerbart fäste; Kompatibel med rackfäste; Kompatibel med virvelstativ; Stativmonterad (stativ för övningsplatta); Bordsmodell / platt bas; Annat
fi: Harjoitusalustan kiinnitystapa: Bassorummun pedaalin harjoitusalusta; Puristinkiinnitteinen; Syli- / polviharjoitusalusta; Sisältää jalallisen / kolmijalkaisen alustan; Moniasentoinen / säädettävä kiinnitys; Yhteensopiva telinekiinnityksen kanssa; Yhteensopiva virvelitelineen kanssa; Telineeseen kiinnitettävä (harjoitusalustan teline); Pöytätaso / litteä alusta; Muu
sl-SI: Stil montaže vadbene podloge: Vadbena blazinica za pedal bas bobna; Na sponko; Vadbena blazinica za na naročje/koleno; Vključeno trinožno/stojalo z nogami; Večpoložajni/nastavljiv nosilec; Združljivo z nosilcem na ogrodju; Združljivo s stojalom za mali boben; Montaža na stojalo (stojalo za vadbeno blazinico); Namizno/raven podstavek; Drugo
zh-CN: 练习垫安装方式: 低音鼓踏板练习垫; 夹式; 腿上 / 膝盖练习垫; 附带带腿 / 三脚架底座; 多位置 / 可调支架; 兼容机架安装; 兼容军鼓支架; 支架安装（练习垫支架）; 桌面 / 平底; 其他
da: Monteringsstil for øvepude: Øveplade til stortrommepedal; Til påspænding (klemme); Øveplade til skød/knæ; Trefod/stativ medfølger; Justerbart beslag / til flere positioner; Kompatibel med rack-montering; Kompatibel med lilletrommestativ; Monteret på stativ (stativ til øveplade); Bordmodel / flad base; Andet
nl: Oefenpad montagestijl: Oefenpad voor basdrumpedaal; Om vast te klemmen; Oefenpad voor op schoot/knie; Inclusief poten/statiefvoet; Meerdere posities/verstelbare houder; Compatibel met rekmontage; Compatibel met snaredrum-standaard; Op een standaard gemonteerd (oefenpad-standaard); Tafelblad/platte bodem; Overig
cs: Způsob upevnění cvičebních podložek: Cvičný pad pro pedál basového bubnu; K připevnění svorkou; Cvičný pad na kolena; Včetně základny s nožičkami/stativem; Vícepolohový / nastavitelný úchyt; Kompatibilní s montáží na rampu; Kompatibilní se stojanem na snare; Montáž na stojan (stojan na cvičný pad); Na stůl / plochá základna; Jiné
ru: Способ крепления тренировочного пэда: Тренировочный пэд для педали бас-барабана; На струбцине; Наколенный тренировочный пэд; Тренога / основание с ножками в комплекте; Многопозиционное / регулируемое крепление; Совместимость с установкой на раму; Совместимость со стойкой для малого барабана; Устанавливается на стойку (стойка для пэда); Настольное / плоское основание; Другое
ko: 연습용 패드 장착 방식: 베이스 드럼 페달 연습용 패드; 클램프 장착형; 무릎 연습용 패드; 다리/삼각대 베이스 포함; 다중 위치/조절식 마운트; 랙 마운트 호환; 스네어 스탠드 호환; 스탠드 장착형(연습용 패드 스탠드); 테이블탑/평면 베이스; 기타
zh-TW: 練習墊安裝款式: 大鼓踏板打點板; 夾式; 大腿/膝蓋打點板; 附支腿/三腳底座; 多段/可調式安裝; 相容於鼓架; 相容於小鼓架; 支架式 (打點板架); 桌上/平底座; 其他
vi: kiểu gắn tấm đệm tập luyện: Mặt gõ tập pedal trống bass; Dạng kẹp; Mặt gõ tập đặt trên đùi / đầu gối; Kèm chân cắm / đế ba chân; Giá treo nhiều vị trí / có thể điều chỉnh; Tương thích với giá treo; Tương thích với giá đỡ trống lẫy; Lắp trên giá đỡ (giá đỡ mặt gõ tập); Để bàn / đế phẳng; Khác
en: Practice pad mounting style: Bass drum pedal practice pad; Clamp-on; Lap / knee practice pad; Legged / tripod base included; Multi-position / adjustable mount; Rack mount compatible; Snare stand compatible; Stand-mounted (practice pad stand); Tabletop / flat base; Other
es: Estilo de montaje de la almohadilla de práctica: Pad de práctica para pedal de bombo; Con abrazadera; Pad de práctica para regazo / rodilla; Base de trípode / con patas incluida; Montaje ajustable / multiposición; Compatible con montaje en rack; Compatible con soporte de redoblante; Montado en soporte (soporte de pad de práctica); De mesa / base plana; Otro